Wyoming, session 2025, SF0060.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-15-111(b)(i), (iii)(intro) and (f)
and 39-16-111(b)(i), (iii)(intro) and (c) are amended to
read:

39-15-111. Distribution.

(b) Revenues earned under W.S. 39-15-104 during each
fiscal year shall be recognized as revenue during that
SF0060

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0460
fiscal year for accounting purposes. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (p) of this section, for all revenue
collected by the department under W.S. 39-15-104 the
department shall:

(i) Credit sixty-nine percent (69%) sixty-five
percent (65%) to the state general fund for deposit by the
state treasurer except as provided by subsections (c) and
(d) of this section and less any credit allowed pursuant to
W.S. 39-15-107(b)(xi);

(iii) From the remaining share, until June 30,
2004, deduct an amount equivalent to one-half percent
(0.5%) and thereafter deduct an amount equivalent to one
percent (1%) of the tax collected under W.S. 39-15-104.
From this amount, the department shall distribute until
June 30, 2004, twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) and
thereafter forty thousand dollars ($40,000.00) annually to
each county in equal monthly installments and then
distribute the remainder to each county in the proportion
that the total population of the county bears to the total
population of the state. The balance shall then be paid
monthly to the treasurers of the counties, cities and towns
SF0060

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0460
for payment into their respective general funds. The
percentage of the balance that will be distributed to each
county and its cities and towns will be determined by
computing the percentage that net sales taxes collected
attributable to vendors in each county including its cities
and towns bear to total net sales taxes collected of
vendors in all counties including their cities and towns.
Subject to subsection (h) of this section, this percentage
of the balance shall be distributed within each county as
follows:

(f) In addition to the distribution specified in
subsection (b) of this section, until June 30, 2004,
twenty-nine and one-half percent (29.5%) and thereafter
thirty-one percent (31%) thirty-five percent (35%) of sales
taxes collected from out-of-state vendors shall be
distributed to counties, cities and towns in the same
percentage as determined in paragraph (b)(iii) of this
section.

39-16-111. Distribution.

SF0060

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0460
(b) Revenues earned under this article during each
fiscal year shall be recognized as revenue during that
fiscal year for accounting purposes. Revenue collected by
the department from the taxes imposed by this article shall
be transferred to the state treasurer who shall, as
specified by the department:

(i) Credit sixty-nine percent (69%) sixty-five
percent (65%) for deposit by the state treasurer to the
general fund except as provided by subsections (d) and (e)
of this section and less any credit allowed pursuant to
W.S. 39-16-107(b)(viii);

(iii) From the remaining share, until June 30,
2004, deduct an amount equivalent to one-half percent
(0.5%) and thereafter deduct an amount equivalent to one
percent (1%) of the tax collected under W.S. 39-16-104.
From this amount, the department shall distribute until
June 30, 2004, five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) and
thereafter ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) annually to
each county in equal monthly installments and then
distribute the remainder to each county in the proportion
that the total population of the county bears to the total
SF0060

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0460
population of the state. The remainder shall then be paid
monthly to the treasurers of the counties, cities and towns
for payment into their respective general funds. The
percentage of the remainder that will be distributed to
each county and its cities and towns will be determined by
computing the percentage that net use taxes collected
attributable to vendors in each county including its cities
and towns bear to total net use taxes collected of vendors
in all counties including their cities and towns. The
distribution shall be as follows:

(c) In addition to the distribution in subsection (b)
of this section, until June 30, 2004, twenty-nine and
one-half percent (29.5%) and thereafter thirty-one percent
(31%) thirty-five percent (35%) of use taxes accruing from
out-of-state vendors shall be distributed to counties,
cities and towns in the same percentage as determined in
paragraph (b)(iii) of this section.

Section 2. This act shall apply to distributions of
sales and use taxes collected on or after July 1, 2025.

SF0060

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0460
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0060